Idaho, session 2026, S1390.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 41-351, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-351. 340B DRUG PRICING PROGRAM REPORTING. (1) As used in this sec-
tion, "340B covered entity" means an entity authorized to participate in the
federal 340B drug pricing program under section 340B(a)(4) of the federal
public health service act.
(2) Before April 1 of each year, a 340B covered entity shall report the
following information to the state department of health and welfare, the
state controller's office, and the attorney general concerning the 340B cov-
ered entity's participation in the federal 340B drug pricing program for the
previous calendar most recent fiscal year:
(a) The name of the covered 340B entity;
(b) The aggregate acquisition cost for prescription drugs obtained un-
der the 340B program and dispensed via contract pharmacies that are not
owned or operated by an affiliated 340B entity;
(c) The aggregate payment amount received for drugs obtained under the
340B program and dispensed to patients 340B savings from the prescrip-
tion drugs dispensed as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) The aggregate payment made to pharmacies under contract to dispense
drugs contract pharmacies that are not owned or operated by an affili-
ated 340B covered entity to dispense drugs obtained under the 340B pro-
gram;
(e) The number of claims for prescription drugs prescriptions dis-
pensed as described in paragraph (c) (b) of this subsection; and
(f) How the 340B covered entity uses any savings from participating in
the 340B program, including the amount of savings used for the provision
of charity care, community benefits, or a similar program of providing
unreimbursed health care to the indigent.
(3) The information required to be reported pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section shall be reported by payer type, including the following:
(a) Commercial;
(b) Medicaid; and
(c) Medicare.
(4) (3) The data submitted in the reports required pursuant to subsec-
tion (2) of this section is confidential, shall be reported through a secure
website portal, and shall not be made available for public inspection.


(5) (4) Before November 15 of each year, the state controller's office
shall prepare a report that aggregates the data submitted pursuant to sub-
section (2) of this section and:
(a) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic for-
mat; and
(b) Make such report available on the transparent Idaho website.
(6) (5) The attorney general may use the information in the reports re-
quired pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for the purposes of inves-
tigating medicaid fraud and ensuring compliance with health resources and
service administration requirements.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.